Washington statutes.
RCW 43.280.070

Gifts, grants, and endowments.

The department of commerce may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of this chapter and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

[ 2012 c 29 s 6; 1995 c 399 s 115; 1990 c 3 s 1208.]